Indiana, session 2026, HB1376.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-135 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 135. (a) "Food", for
purposes of IC 16-42-1 through IC 16-42-4, and IC 16-42-5.5, and
IC 16-42-18, means the following:
(1) Articles used for food, drink, confectionery, or condiment for
humans.
(2) Chewing gum.
(3) Articles used for components of any of these articles.
(b) "Food", for purposes of IC 16-42-5 and IC 16-42-5.2, means the
following:
(1) All articles used for food, drink, confectionery, or condiment
whether simple, mixed, or compound.
(2) All substances or ingredients used in the preparation of the
items described in subdivision (1).
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-294.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 294.7. "Prohibited food additive",
2026 IN 1376—LS 6623/DI 150


for purposes of IC 16-42-5.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-42-5.5-3.
SECTION 3. IC 16-42-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5.5. Restrictions on Food Additives
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "food" has the meaning set forth
in IC 16-18-2-135(a).
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "person" has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-18-2-274(a).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "prohibited food additive" refers
to the following substances:
(1) Butylated hydroxyanisole (BHA) (CAS 25013-16-5).
(2) Butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT) (CAS 128-37-0).
(3) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).
(4) Titanium dioxide (CAS 13463-67-7).
(5) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).
(6) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).
Sec. 4. A person may not do the following in Indiana:
(1) Sell food containing a prohibited food additive.
(2) Store food containing a prohibited food additive.
(3) Distribute food containing a prohibited food additive.
(4) Use a prohibited food additive in the preparation of food.
Sec. 5. The state department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to administer this chapter.
Sec. 6. The state health commissioner shall enforce the
provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 7. A person who recklessly violates this chapter commits a
Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 4. IC 35-52-16-86.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 86.5. IC 16-42-5.5-7 defines a
crime concerning the restriction on prohibited food additives.
2026 IN 1376—LS 6623/DI 150